Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 51-104b, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 51-104b. A. The Public Employees Relations Board is
empowered, as hereinafter provided, to prevent any person, including
bargaining agent and corporate authorities, from engaging in any
unfair labor practice as defined herein.
B. Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in or is
engaging in any such unfair labor practice, the Board shall have the
power to issue and cause to be served upon such person a complaint
stating the charges in that respect, and containing a notice of
hearing before the Board, at a place therein fixed, not less than
five (5) days after the serving of said complaint. The person so
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1424 Page 1

comp lained of shall have the right to file an answer and to appear
and give testimony at the time and place fixed in the complaint. In
the discretion of the Board, any other person may be allowed to
intervene in such proceeding set the matter for hearing, take
evidence, and decide the questions presented.
C. If upon the preponderance of the testimony taken the Board
shall be of the opinion that the person named in the complaint has
engaged in or is engaging in any such unfair labor practice, then
the Board shall state its findings of fact and shall issue and cause
to be served on such person an order requiring such person to cease
and desist from such unfair labor practice. Such order may further
require such person to make reports from time to time showing the
extent to which it has complied with the order. If upon the
preponderance of the testimony taken the Board shall not be of the
opinion that the person served in the complaint has engaged in or is
engaging in any such unfair labor practice, then the Board shall
state its findings of fact and shall issue an order dismissing the
complaint.
D. The Board, or any interested party, shall have the power to
petition the district court, wherein the unfair labor practice in
question occurred, for the enforcement of such order and for
appropriate temporary relief of restraining order.


ENGR. H. B. NO. 1424 Page 2

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 51-107a of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Whenever an employer or bargaining agent claims that an
unfair labor practice has been committed by the other, it shall
notify the other in writing, within six (6) months of the commission
of the alleged practice. Within ten (10) days of such notification
each party shall each select and name one arbitrator and shall
immediately thereafter notify each other in writing of the name and
address of the person so selected. The two arbitrators so selected
and named shall, within five (5) days from and after the expiration
of the ten-day period hereinabove mentioned, agree upon and select a
third arbitrator. If, on the expiration of the period allowed
therefor, the arbitrators are unable to agree upon the selection of
a third arbitrator, the bargaining agent and the corporate
authorities shall request the Federal Mediation and Conciliation
Service to provide a list of five arbitrators.
B. Within ten (10) days after receipt of the list of
arbitrators from the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, the
two arbitrators already selected shall alternately strike the name
of one arbitrator from the list of five until one name remains, with
the party claiming an unfair labor practice has been committed
making the first strike from the list. The third arbitrator,
whether selected as a result of an agreement between the two
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1424 Page 3

arbi trators previously selected or selected from the list provided
by the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, shall act as
chairperson of the Arbitration Board. The chairperson of the
Arbitration Board shall schedule a hearing, take evidence, and
render a decision based thereon. Decisions of the former Public
Employees Relations Board and of the National Labor Relations Board
may be considered persuasive on the issues presented.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 51-110, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 51-110. Fees and necessary expenses of the arbitrator
selected by the bargaining agent and the arbitrator selected by the
corporate authorities shall be borne by the bargaining agent and the
corporate authorities respectively. The reasonable fees and
necessary expenses of the third arbitrator shall be borne equally by
the bargaining agent and corporate authorities. This provision
applies for interest arbitration, consideration of alleged unfair
labor practices, and for certification, decertification, election or
determination of the bargaining representative.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.





ENGR. H. B. NO. 1424 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1424 Page 5